Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2801
Designation.

Each county court shall have a Small Claims Department which shall be designated the Small Claims Court.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 21;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-521.

Small claims court is a department of county court, and as such, small claims court does not have general equity jurisdiction. Scherbak v. Kissler, 245 Neb. 10, 510 N.W.2d 318 (1994).

In an appeal to the district court from the Small Claims Court, a party has the right to appear by his own counsel. Simon v. Lieberman, 193 Neb. 321, 226 N.W.2d 781 (1975).